Tennessee, session 114, SB2305.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. The department of veterans services shall submit a report on the total
number of state and federal benefits, and a synopsis of each benefit, available to a veteran and
the veteran's surviving spouse to the speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives on or before January 1, 2027.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2305
012565
- 1 -